Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1506
Community College Board of Governors; membership.

Each community college area shall be governed by a board composed of eleven members. The governing boards shall be known as the Community College Board of Governors for the community college area the board serves.

Laws 1975, LB 344, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 31;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 79-2640;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 28.

Chapter 79, article 26, the Technical Community College Area Act, is not in violation of Article VIII, section 1A, of the Constitution. State ex rel. Western Technical Com. Col. Area v. Tallon, 196 Neb. 603, 244 N.W.2d 183 (1976).